Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,152
Commercial driver's license issued
to minor; form.

Any commercial driver's license issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles to a minor as defined in section 53-103.23, as such definition may be amended
from time to time by the Legislature, shall be of a distinct designation,
of a type prescribed by the director, from the commercial driver's license
of a person who is not a minor.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 102;

Laws 1993, LB 201, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 81.